Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB706.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2006-B(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2006-B. Limitations.(a) Amount.--* * *(3) The department shall ensure that tax credits under this article are approved in an equitable manner for contributions from business firms headquartered in each region of this Commonwealth, including the northcentral region, northeast region, northwest region, southcentral region, southeast region and southwest region of this 1234567891011121314151617181920 Commonwealth. Tax credits approved for contributions from business firms headquartered in a region of this Commonwealth that are unclaimed shall be promptly reallocated to business firms in other regions of this Commonwealth. The department may develop guidelines to implement this paragraph.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0706PN0743 - 2 - 1234567